Maine, session 132, LD1047.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5204-C is enacted to read:
§5204-C. Additional tax on capital gains
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, in addition to any other tax
imposed by this Part, a tax at the rate of 4% is imposed on income derived from capital
gains over the following amounts:
1. Single and married filing separately. For single individuals and married
individuals filing separately, $250,000;
2. Heads of households. For unmarried individuals or legally separated individuals
who qualify as heads of households, $375,000; and
3. Individuals filing jointly. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving
spouses permitted to file a joint return, $500,000.